Massachusetts, session 194th, H1168.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (g) of section 15 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place
thereof the following sentence:- No carrier shall require an insured to obtain a referral or prior
authorization from a primary care provider for specialty care provided by an obstetrician,
gynecologist, certified nurse-midwife or family practitioner participating in such carrier's health
care provider network for the following: (i) annual preventive gynecologic health examinations,
including any subsequent obstetric or gynecological services determined by such obstetrician,
gynecologist, certified nurse-midwife or family practitioner to be medically necessary as a result
of such examination; (ii) preventative gynecologic health care and menstrual health conditions
such as abnormal uterine bleeding, dysmenorrhea and pelvic pain; (iii) maternity care; and (iv)
medically necessary evaluations and resultant health care services for acute or emergency
gynecological conditions.
of 1